Hawaii statutes.
§624-24.5 Compelling attendance of witness;
commission for taking testimony. (a) When the taking of a deposition is
authorized by statute or rule of court, the attendance of the witness and the
answering of questions may, except as otherwise provided, be compelled:

(1) By any court when the action or proceeding is
pending before it or the taking of the deposition has been ordered by it;

(2) By the circuit court of the circuit in which the
deposition is being taken, when the action or proceeding is pending before, or
the taking of the deposition has been ordered by, another circuit court or an
arbitrator or other person, other than a court;

(3) By the district court of the circuit in which the
deposition is being taken, when the action or proceeding is pending before, or
the taking of the deposition has been ordered by, another district court.

(b) When the taking of a deposition outside
the State is authorized by statute or rule of court and the issuance of a
commission or letters rogatory is appropriate, the same may be issued by any
court before which the action or proceeding is pending, or which has ordered or
given leave for the taking of the deposition. [L 1972, c 143, §1(b)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next